Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 2487 DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 9 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; and 10 for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,377,294 12 2. Of the amount appropriated in subsection 1, the following 13 amount is transferred to Iowa state university of science and 14 technology to be used for the universityâs midwest grape and 15 wine industry institute: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 325,000 17 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 18 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 19 of management. The report must describe in detail the 20 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this section to support 21 the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 22 Sec. 2. UNCLAIMED PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING WINNINGS ââ 23 HORSE AND DOG RACING. There is appropriated from the moneys 24 available under section 99D.13 to the department of agriculture 25 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 26 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so 27 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 28 designated: 29 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs administration 30 and enforcement of horse and dog racing law pursuant to section 31 99D.22 , including for salaries, support, maintenance, and 32 miscellaneous purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 305,516 34 Sec. 3. RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ MOTOR 35 -1- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 22 S.F. 2487 FUEL INSPECTION. There is appropriated from the renewable 1 fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 to the 2 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 4 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 For purposes of the inspection of motor fuel, including 7 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 9 Sec. 4. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND. There 10 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 11 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 12 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 13 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 14 used for the purposes designated: 15 1. DAIRY REGULATION 16 a. For purposes of performing functions pursuant to section 17 192.109 , including conducting a survey of grade âAâ milk and 18 certifying the results to the secretary of agriculture: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 189,196 20 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 21 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 22 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 23 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 24 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 25 2. LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM 26 a. For purposes of supporting the local food and farm 27 program pursuant to chapter 267A : 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 29 b. The department shall enter into a cost-sharing agreement 30 with Iowa state university of science and technology to support 31 the local food and farm program coordinator position as part of 32 the universityâs cooperative extension service in agriculture 33 and home economics pursuant to chapter 267A . 34 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 35 -2- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 2/ 22 S.F. 2487 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 1 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 2 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 3 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 4 3. AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION 5 a. For purposes of allocating moneys to an Iowa association 6 affiliated with a national organization that promotes 7 agricultural education providing for future farmers: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 9 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 10 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 11 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 12 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 13 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 14 4. FOREIGN ANIMAL DISEASES AFFLICTING LIVESTOCK 15 For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness and 16 response fund created in section 163.3B : 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,050,000 18 5. FARMERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM 19 a. For purposes of supporting a program for farmers with 20 disabilities: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 230,000 22 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 23 used for the public purpose of providing a grant to a national 24 nonprofit organization with over 80 years of experience in 25 assisting children and adults with disabilities and special 26 needs. The moneys shall be used to support a nationally 27 recognized program that began in 1986 and has been replicated 28 in at least 30 other states, but is not available through 29 any other entity in this state, and that provides assistance 30 to farmers with disabilities in all 99 counties to allow the 31 farmers to remain in their own homes and be gainfully engaged 32 in farming through provision of agricultural worksite and home 33 modification consultations, peer support services, services 34 to families, information and referral, and equipment loan 35 -3- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 3/ 22 S.F. 2487 services. 1 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 2 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 3 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 4 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 5 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 6 6. LOESS HILLS DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 7 a. For deposit in the loess hills development and 8 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.2 : 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 10 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 11 $270,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs hungry canyons 12 account. 13 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 14 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 15 c. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 16 $30,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs loess hills alliance 17 account. 18 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 19 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 20 7. SOUTHERN IOWA DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 21 a. For deposit in the southern Iowa development and 22 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.12 : 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 24 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 25 this subsection may be used for administrative costs. 26 8. GRAIN REGULATION 27 For the administration and enforcement of chapters 203 28 and 203C , including salaries, support, maintenance, and 29 miscellaneous purposes: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350,000 31 9. CHOOSE IOWA FUND 32 a. For deposit in the choose Iowa fund created in section 33 187.201 : 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,113,000 35 -4- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 4/ 22 S.F. 2487 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 1 the department shall use at least $500,000 to support the 2 value-added agricultural grant program created in section 3 187.321 . 4 (2) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 5 department may use up to $1,113,000 to support the choose Iowa 6 promotional program as provided in chapter 187, subchapter III, 7 part 1 . 8 (3) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 9 department shall use at least $500,000 to support the dairy 10 innovation and revitalization program created in section 11 187.311 . 12 c. The department may increase or decrease the amount of 13 moneys used to support a program described in paragraph âbâ 14 based on the amount of moneys awarded to persons participating 15 in the program. The department shall publish a notice of the 16 departmentâs action to increase or decrease the amount on the 17 departmentâs internet site where the programs are advertised at 18 least thirty days prior to the day that the department takes 19 such action. 20 10. CHOOSE IOWA FOOD PURCHASING PROGRAM 21 a. For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa food 22 purchasing program to assist eligible participants in 23 purchasing qualified food products pursuant to section 187.331 : 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 25 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 26 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 27 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 28 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 29 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 30 DIVISION II 31 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 32 Sec. 5. GENERAL FUND. 33 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 34 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year 35 -5- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 5/ 22 S.F. 2487 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 1 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 2 purposes designated: 3 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 4 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; and 5 for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,816,738 7 2. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 8 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department of 9 management. The report must describe in detail the expenditure 10 of moneys appropriated under this section to support the 11 departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 12 Sec. 6. STATE FISH AND GAME PROTECTION FUND ââ REGULATION 13 AND ADVANCEMENT OF OUTDOOR ACTIVITIES. 14 1. There is appropriated from the state fish and game 15 protection fund created pursuant to section 456A.17 to the 16 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 17 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, 18 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 19 designated: 20 For purposes of supporting the regulation or advancement of 21 hunting, fishing, or trapping, or the protection, propagation, 22 restoration, management, or harvest of fish or wildlife, 23 including for administration, regulation, law enforcement, and 24 programs; and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, 25 and miscellaneous purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,095,606 27 2. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use 28 the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game 29 protection fund to provide for the funding of health and life 30 insurance premium payments from unused sick leave balances 31 of conservation peace officers employed in a protection 32 occupation, as described in section 97B.49B , who retire. 33 3. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may 34 use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish 35 -6- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 6/ 22 S.F. 2487 and game protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as is necessary to fund 2 salary adjustments for departmental employees for which the 3 general assembly has made an operating budget appropriation in 4 subsection 1. 5 Sec. 7. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ WATER QUALITY. There 6 is appropriated from the groundwater protection fund created 7 in section 455E.11 to the department of natural resources for 8 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 9 2027, from those moneys that are not allocated pursuant to 10 that section, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 11 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 12 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection 13 of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, 14 regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, 15 maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,455,850 17 Sec. 8. SPECIAL SNOWMOBILE FUND ââ SNOWMOBILE 18 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the special snowmobile 19 fund created under section 321G.7 to the department of natural 20 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 21 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 22 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 23 For purposes of administering and enforcing the state 24 snowmobile programs: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 26 Sec. 9. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND. There 27 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 28 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 29 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 30 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 31 designated: 32 1. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 33 a. For purposes of supporting floodplain management and dam 34 safety: 35 -7- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 7/ 22 S.F. 2487 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,510,000 1 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to 2 $400,000 may be used by the department to acquire or install 3 stream gages for purposes of tracking and predicting flood 4 events and for compiling necessary data to improve flood 5 frequency analysis. 6 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 7 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 8 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 9 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 10 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 11 2. FORESTRY HEALTH MANAGEMENT 12 a. For purposes of providing for forestry health management 13 programs: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 525,000 15 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 16 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 17 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 18 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 19 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 20 3. STATE PARK OPERATIONS 21 For supporting operations at state parks, including 22 maintenance and repair of grounds and facilities: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 24 4. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE 25 For structural and infrastructural repairs in state parks: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 27 DIVISION III 28 IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY 29 Sec. 10. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND. There 30 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to Iowa 31 state university of science and technology for the fiscal year 32 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 33 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 34 purposes designated: 35 -8- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 8/ 22 S.F. 2487 1. VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY 1 a. For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 2 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 3 laboratory: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,799,898 5 b. (1) Iowa state university of science and technology 6 shall not reduce the amount that it allocates to support the 7 college of veterinary medicine from any other source due to the 8 appropriation made in this subsection. 9 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a reduction made 10 to support the college of veterinary medicine if the same 11 percentage of reduction imposed on the college of veterinary 12 medicine is also imposed on all of Iowa state university of 13 science and technologyâs budget units. 14 2. MANAGEMENT OF PRIVATE FORESTS 15 a. For purposes of supporting the Iowa cooperative 16 extension service in agriculture and home economics in 17 providing technical support to landowners and loggers regarding 18 the management of private forests in northeast Iowa: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 20 b. The department of natural resources shall cooperate with 21 the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 22 economics in administering this subsection. 23 3. LIVESTOCK DISEASE RESEARCH 24 a. For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 25 created in section 267.8 : 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 291,390 27 b. Moneys appropriated under this subsection shall be used 28 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 29 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 30 producers. 31 Sec. 11. IOWA NUTRIENT RESEARCH FUND ââ VETERINARY 32 DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY. Notwithstanding section 466B.46 , there 33 is appropriated from the Iowa nutrient research fund created 34 in section 466B.46 to Iowa state university of science and 35 -9- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 9/ 22 S.F. 2487 technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 1 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 2 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 3 For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 4 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 5 laboratory: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 7 DIVISION IV 8 STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 9 Sec. 12. IOWAâS CENTER FOR AGRICULTURAL SAFETY AND HEALTH 10 (I-CASH). 11 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 12 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 13 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, 14 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 15 designated: 16 For supporting the operations of Iowaâs center for 17 agricultural safety and health, as part of the universityâs 18 college of public health, and in cooperation with the 19 department of agriculture and land stewardship, to anticipate, 20 recognize, and prevent occupational illness and injury among 21 members of the agricultural community: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,154 23 2. a. As a condition of the appropriation made in 24 subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall retain the 25 director of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health 26 employed on the effective date of this division of this Act for 27 at least the same number of hours for the fiscal year beginning 28 July 1, 2026, as worked by the director during the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2025. 30 b. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 31 1, the state university of Iowa shall not reduce the amount 32 allocated to support Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and 33 health from any other source due to the appropriation made in 34 subsection 1. 35 -10- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 10/ 22 S.F. 2487 3. If moneys appropriated in subsection 1 revert as required 1 pursuant to section 8.33 , the state university of Iowa shall 2 transfer to the general fund of the state from any otherwise 3 unencumbered or unobligated moneys from any other general 4 fund appropriation or from any moneys available from other 5 funding sources an amount equal to the amount appropriated in 6 subsection 1 less any amount that reverted to the general fund 7 of the state pursuant to section 8.33 . 8 Sec. 13. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY ââ GROUNDWATER PLANNING AND 9 RESOURCE ASSESSMENT PROJECT. 10 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 11 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 12 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, 13 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 14 designated: 15 For purposes of supporting a groundwater planning and 16 resource assessment project to be administered by the Iowa 17 geological survey of the state created pursuant to section 18 456.1 : 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 20 2. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 21 by the Iowa geological survey to map and assess the condition 22 of this stateâs aquifers. The Iowa geological survey may 23 measure the volume of groundwater that is available for various 24 uses, the current and predicted allocations of groundwater to 25 support those uses, the recharge rate for the aquifers, and 26 the development of models for budgeting this stateâs water 27 resources. 28 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 29 subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 30 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 31 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in 32 subsection 1. 33 DIVISION V 34 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS 35 -11- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 11/ 22 S.F. 2487 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND 1 STEWARDSHIP. There is appropriated from the environment first 2 fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 3 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 4 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so 5 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 6 designated: 7 1. CONSERVATION RESERVE ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM (CREP) 8 a. For the conservation reserve enhancement program to 9 restore and construct wetlands for the purposes of intercepting 10 tile line runoff, reducing nutrient loss, improving water 11 quality, and enhancing agricultural production practices: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 13 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 14 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 15 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 16 c. Notwithstanding section 8.57A, subsection 3, or any 17 other provision of law to the contrary, the department may use 18 moneys appropriated in this subsection, in combination with 19 other appropriate environment first fund appropriations, for 20 cost sharing to match United States department of agriculture, 21 natural resources conservation service, wetlands reserve 22 enhancement program (WREP) funding available to Iowa. 23 2. WATERSHED PROTECTION 24 a. For continuation of a program that provides 25 multiobjective resource protections for flood control, water 26 quality, erosion control, and natural resource conservation: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 28 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 29 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 30 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 31 3. CONSERVATION BUFFER STRIP PROGRAM 32 a. To encourage and assist farmers to establish and maintain 33 conservation buffer strip practices and to work with them to 34 enhance their revegetation efforts to improve water quality and 35 -12- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 12/ 22 S.F. 2487 habitat: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 2 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 3 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 4 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 5 4. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION 6 a. For use by the department in providing for soil and water 7 conservation: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,325,000 9 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for 10 transfer to the hungry canyons account of the loess hills 11 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 : 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 140,000 13 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys transferred in 14 subparagraph (1) may be used for administrative costs. 15 c. Of the remaining amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, 16 for use by the department in providing for soil and water 17 conservation administration, the conservation of soil and 18 water resources, or the support of soil and water conservation 19 districts: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,185,000 21 d. Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âcâ that the 22 department allocates to a soil and water conservation district, 23 the first $15,000 may be expended by the district for the 24 purpose of providing financial incentives under section 161A.73 25 to establish management practices for the control of soil 26 erosion on land that is row-cropped, including but not limited 27 to nontill planting, ridge-till planting, and contouring 28 strip-cropping. Of any remaining amount of that appropriation 29 allocated by the department to a district, 30 percent may be 30 expended by the district for that same purpose. 31 e. Not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in 32 paragraph âcâ may be allocated for cost sharing to address 33 complaints filed under section 161A.47 . 34 f. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ, 5 percent 35 -13- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 13/ 22 S.F. 2487 shall be allocated for financial incentives to establish 1 practices to protect watersheds above publicly owned lakes of 2 the state from soil erosion and sediment as provided in section 3 161A.73 . 4 g. The departmentâs division of soil conservation and 5 water quality may allocate moneys appropriated in paragraph 6 âcâ to conduct research and demonstration projects to promote 7 conservation tillage and nonpoint source pollution control 8 practices. 9 h. The allocation of moneys as financial incentives as 10 provided in section 161A.73 may be used in combination with 11 moneys allocated by the department of natural resources. 12 i. Not more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated 13 in paragraph âcâ may be used for costs of administration and 14 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 15 5. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION ââ ADMINISTRATION 16 a. For use by the department for costs of administration and 17 implementation of soil and water conservation practices: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,800,000 19 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, $150,000 20 is allocated to support field staff providing technical 21 assistance. 22 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. There is 23 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 24 8.57A to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 25 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 26 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 27 used for the purposes designated: 28 1. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS 29 For regular maintenance and operations of state parks and 30 staff time associated with these activities: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,235,000 32 2. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) 33 To provide local watershed managers with geographic 34 information system data for their use in developing, 35 -14- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 14/ 22 S.F. 2487 monitoring, and displaying results of their watershed work: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,000 2 3. WATER QUALITY MONITORING 3 For continuing the establishment and operation of water 4 quality monitoring stations: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,955,000 6 4. PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM ACCOUNT 7 For deposit in the public water supply system account of the 8 water quality protection fund created in section 455B.183A : 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 10 5. REGULATION OF ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS 11 For the regulation of animal feeding operations, including 12 as provided for in chapters 459 , 459A , and 459B : 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,320,000 14 6. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 15 For supporting floodplain management and dam safety: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 375,000 17 7. AMBIENT AIR QUALITY 18 For the abatement, control, and prevention of ambient 19 air pollution in this state, including measures as necessary 20 to assure attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality 21 standards from particulate matter: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 23 Sec. 16. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA ââ IOWA GEOLOGICAL 24 SURVEY. There is appropriated from the environment first 25 fund created in section 8.57A to the state university of Iowa 26 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 27 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 28 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 29 1. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY OPERATIONS 30 For purposes of supporting the operations of the Iowa 31 geological survey of the state created pursuant to section 32 456.1 , including but not limited to providing analysis; 33 data maintenance, collection, and compilation; investigative 34 programs; and information for water supply development and 35 -15- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 15/ 22 S.F. 2487 protection: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 2 2. WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 3 For purposes of supporting the Iowa geological survey in 4 measuring, assessing, and evaluating the quantity of water 5 sources in this state and assisting the department of natural 6 resources in regulating water quantity as provided in chapter 7 455B, subchapter III, part 4 , pursuant to sections 455B.262B 8 and 456.14 : 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 495,000 10 Sec. 17. REVERSION. 11 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and 12 notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the 13 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, in this division of this 14 Act that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 15 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 16 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 17 the succeeding fiscal year, or until the project for which the 18 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 19 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for 20 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, in this division of 21 this Act to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 22 to provide financial assistance for the establishment of 23 permanent soil and water conservation practices that remain 24 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 25 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 26 for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year 27 beginning July 1, 2029. 28 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to moneys transferred 29 pursuant to this division of this Act to the loess hills 30 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 , 31 which shall not revert as provided in that section. 32 DIVISION VI 33 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS 34 Sec. 18. WATER QUALITY INITIATIVE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 35 -16- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 16/ 22 S.F. 2487 AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 1 1. There is appropriated from the environment first fund 2 created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 3 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 4 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so 5 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 6 designated: 7 For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in 8 section 466B.45 , for purposes of supporting the water quality 9 initiative administered by the division of soil conservation 10 and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including 11 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,375,000 13 2. a. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be 14 used to support projects in subwatersheds as designated by the 15 division that are part of high-priority watersheds identified 16 by the water resources coordinating council established 17 pursuant to section 466B.3 . 18 b. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to 19 support projects in watersheds generally, including regional 20 watersheds, as designated by the division and high-priority 21 watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating 22 council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . 23 3. In supporting projects in subwatersheds and watersheds 24 as provided in subsection 2, all of the following apply: 25 a. The demonstration projects shall utilize water quality 26 practices as described in the Iowa nutrient reduction strategy 27 as defined in section 455B.171 . 28 b. The division shall implement demonstration projects as 29 provided in paragraph âaâ by providing for participation by 30 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in 31 farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide 32 for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a 33 legal interest in agricultural land located within the same 34 subwatershed. 35 -17- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 17/ 22 S.F. 2487 c. The division shall implement a demonstration project on 1 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. However, 2 except for edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the 3 amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of 4 establishing the practice as determined by the division or 5 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, 6 whichever is less. 7 d. The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other 8 persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar 9 water quality practices. The division shall promote field day 10 events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish 11 water quality practices on their agricultural land. 12 e. The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 13 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 14 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 15 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 16 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 17 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 18 land shall be a confidential record under section 22.7 . 19 4. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 20 to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages 21 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for 22 farming to implement water quality practices, including the 23 establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and 24 not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. 25 5. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used 26 to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of 27 efforts provided in this section. 28 6. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used by 29 the department to support urban soil and water conservation 30 efforts, which may include but are not limited to management 31 practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of 32 permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. 33 The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided 34 in chapter 161A . 35 -18- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 18/ 22 S.F. 2487 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 1 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in 2 subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of this section on a 3 cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to 4 the department from a state or federal source. 5 8. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 6 this section may be used to pay for the costs of administering 7 and implementing the water quality initiative by the 8 departmentâs division of soil conservation and water quality as 9 provided in section 466B.42 and this section. 10 DIVISION VII 11 RESOURCES ENHANCEMENT AND PROTECTION ââ OPEN SPACES 12 Sec. 19. REAP ââ IN LIEU OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. In 13 lieu of the standing appropriation in section 455A.18 , there is 14 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 15 8.57A to the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund 16 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 17 30, 2027, the following amount, to be allocated as provided in 18 section 455A.19 : 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,000,000 20 Sec. 20. REAP ââ OPEN SPACES ACCOUNT ââ STATE PARK 21 MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND FACILITY REFURBISHMENT. 22 Notwithstanding section 455A.19, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, 23 subparagraph (1), of the moneys allocated to the open spaces 24 account of the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund, 25 up to $1,000,000 may be used by the department of natural 26 resources for state park maintenance, development, operations, 27 and facility refurbishment for the fiscal year beginning July 28 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. 29 DIVISION VIII 30 ANIMAL DISEASE PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE 31 Sec. 21. IOWA ANIMAL DISEASE PREVENTION FUND ââ DEPARTMENT 32 OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 33 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease 34 prevention fund created in section 165.18 to the department of 35 -19- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 19/ 22 S.F. 2487 agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning 1 July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, 2 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 3 designated: 4 a. For purposes of purchasing and maintaining equipment 5 to further the implementation of the foreign animal disease 6 preparedness and response strategy developed under section 7 163.3C : 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 9 b. For purposes of assisting in the development of vaccines 10 against foreign animal diseases by a company based in Iowa that 11 develops livestock and other animal vaccines: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 13 c. For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 14 and response fund created in section 163.3B : 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 16 d. For purposes of upgrading information technology 17 resources used by the department: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 19 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 20 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 21 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 22 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 23 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 24 Sec. 22. IOWA ANIMAL DISEASE PREVENTION FUND ââ IOWA STATE 25 UNIVERSITY. 26 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease 27 prevention fund created in section 165.18 to Iowa state 28 university of science and technology for the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 30 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 31 purposes designated: 32 For deposit in the livestock disease research fund created 33 in section 267.8 : 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 35 -20- LSB 5010SV (1) 91 sb/js 20/ 22 S.F. 2487 2. Moneys appropriated under subsection 1 shall be used 1 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 2 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 3 producers. 4